Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB49.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 335.330 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for licensure as a marriage and family therapist shall pay the board an
initial fee which shall be established by administrative regulation promulgated by
the board. The applicant shall show the board that the applicant has:
(a)[(1)] Completed a master's or doctoral degree program in marriage and family
therapy, from a regionally-accredited educational institution, or a master's,
post-master's, or doctoral program approved by the Commission on
Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education or any of its
successor organizations, or an equivalent course of study as defined by the
board by promulgation of administrative regulations, subject to the
following:[.]
1.[(a)] The degree or equivalent course of study shall contain specific
coursework on psychopathology and the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual; and
2.[(b)] In determining equivalency, the board shall use the criteria for
marriage and family therapy education and clinical training approved by
the United States Department of Education;
(b)[(2)] Completed each of the following:
1.[(a)] At least two (2) years' experience in the practice of marriage and
family therapy, acceptable to the board and subsequent to being granted
a master's degree; and
2.[(b)] A minimum of two hundred (200) hours of clinical supervision
acceptable to the board and subsequent to being granted a master's
degree; and
(c)[(3)] Passed a written examination prescribed by the board by promulgation
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 68
of administrative regulations.
(2) If the board identifies any technical error in the application;
(a) The board shall notify the applicant of the error within one (1) week of its
discovery;
(b) The applicant shall correct the error within two (2) weeks; and
(c) The board shall review the correction within one (1) week of the submitted
correction.
(3) The board shall issue the license within two (2) weeks of the date the application
is complete.
Section 2. KRS 335.332 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who fills all of the requirements of KRS 335.330 shall apply to the board
for a marriage and family therapist associate permit in order to practice and earn the
experience required for license application.
(2) A marriage and family therapy associate shall engage in the practice of marriage
and family therapy while receiving qualifying experience [by contracting, in
writing, ]with an approved supervisor or an approved acting supervisor, as defined
by the board in administrative regulations, who shall assume responsibility for and
supervise the marriage and family therapy associate's practice as directed by the
board by promulgation of administrative regulations. A marriage and family
therapy associate shall not engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy
without a board approved supervisor or an approved acting supervisor[No
marriage and family therapy associate shall enter into a practice of marriage and
family therapy until this contract has been approved by the board, and the marriage
and family therapy associate shall cease the practice of marriage and family therapy
immediately upon termination of the contract. At the termination of the contract, the
marriage and family therapy associate shall apply for licensure as a marriage and
family therapist or request an extension of the contract from the board].
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 68
(3) The fees and all other requirements for a marriage and family therapist associate
permit shall be established by the board by promulgation of administrative
regulations.
Section 3. KRS 335.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Licensure issued under KRS 335.330 shall be renewed annually upon
payment of a fee to be established by administrative regulation promulgated
by the board not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(b) The board shall issue the renewal licensure within two (2) weeks after
receiving the renewal request.
(2) On January 1, 1999, all persons authorized to use the title "certified marriage and
family therapist" shall be deemed "licensed marriage and family therapists" until
the date of their second annual license renewal. As of that date, each formerly
certified licensee seeking license renewal shall provide the board with verification
of education or experience relating to psychopathology, as determined by
administrative regulations promulgated by the board, to include:
(a) Coursework in psychopathology;
(b) Supervised experience with a focus on diagnosis; or
(c) Completion of equivalent continuing education units relating to
psychopathology.
This subsection shall not apply to license renewals for those persons also licensed
or certified by another mental health profession which authorizes diagnosis within
its scope of practice.
(3) A ninety (90) day grace period shall be granted during which time licensees may
continue to practice and may renew their licenses upon payment of the renewal fee
plus a late renewal fee as promulgated by administrative regulation of the board.
Any license not renewed during this period shall expire. The board may reinstate an
expired license within three (3) years of its expiration date upon payment of the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 68
renewal fee and satisfaction of other requirements.
(4) A suspended license is subject to expiration and termination and shall be renewed
as provided in this chapter. Renewal shall not entitle the licensee to engage in the
practice of marriage and family therapy until the suspension has ended, or is
otherwise removed by the board and the right to practice is restored by the board.
(5) A revoked license is subject to expiration or termination but may not be renewed. If
it is reinstated, the licensee shall pay the renewal fee as set forth in subsection (1) of
this section.
(6) A person who fails to reinstate his or her license within three (3) years of its
termination may not have it renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated. A person
may apply for and obtain a new license by meeting the current requirements of this
chapter.
(7) The board shall require that a person applying for renewal or reinstatement of
licensure show evidence of completion of continuing education as prescribed by the
board by administrative regulations, not to exceed twenty (20) clock hours per
renewal period.
Section 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335.300 TO 335.399 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall grant a reciprocal license to an applicant who:
(a) Holds an active license from another state to practice as an independent
marriage and family therapist;
(b) Is in good standing with the certifying or licensing board of that state;
(c) Is of good moral character;
(d) Has not had disciplinary actions of a serious nature brought against them
by a registration, certification, or licensing board or agency;
(e) Has met the examination requirement in Section 1 of this Act; and
(f) Has paid the application fee to the board.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 68
(2) The applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) of
Section 1 of this Act.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed